dictsource/qya_rules
// syllable nuclei: vowels (any length) and diphthongs
.L01 i e a o u í é á ó ú î ê â ô û ui oi ai iu eu au
// front vowels (finally): after these, ht is [çt]
.L02 i e í é î ê ui oi ai
// back vowels (finally): after these, ht is [xt]
.L03 a o u á ó ú â ô û iu eu au

.replace
	// turn x into cs, both because that’s how it’s pronounced
	// and to free up x as a single letter for ch (see immediately below)
	x	cs
	// turn ch, dh, th into single consonants for stress purposes
	ch	x
	dh	ð
	th	þ
	// turn k into c: both letters are equivalent in Tolkien’s languages,
	// with c usually reserved for Eldarin languages and k for others
	k	c

.group a
	a	a
	ai (+	aI
	au (+	aU
	// light penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenultimate
	a (L01X	=a
	a (CL01X	=a

.group á
	á	a:

.group â
	â	a::

.group b
	b	b
	bb	b:

.group c
	c	k
	cc	k:
	// recall that ch was replaced with x earlier

.group x
	x	X

.group d
	d	d
	db	d:
	// recall that dh was replaced with ð earlier

.group ð
	ð	D

.group e
	e	E
	eu (+	EU
	// light penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenultimate
	e (L01X	=E
	e (CL01X	=E

.group é
	é	e:

.group ê
	ê	e::

.group f
	f	f
	f (_	v

.group g
	g	g
	gg	g:

.group h
	h	h
	L02) ht	Ct
	L03) ht	xt
	hl	l#
	hr	hR
	hw	w#
	hy	C

.group i
	i	I
	iu (+	iu
	// light penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenultimate
	i (L01X	=I
	i (CL01X	=I

.group í
	í	i:

.group î
	î	i::

// j does not occur in Quenya

// recall that k was replaced with c earlier

.group l
	l	l

.group m
	m	m

.group n
	n	n

.group ng
	ng	Ng
	ng (_	N

.group o
	o	O
	oi (+	OI
	// light penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenultimate
	o (L01X	=O
	o (CL01X	=O

.group ó
	ó	o:

.group ô
	ô	o::

.group p
	p	p
	pp	p:

.group ph
	ph	f
	A) ph (A	f:

.group q
	q	kw // (immature) Qenya
	qu	kw

.group r
	r	R

.group s
	s	s

.group t
	t	t
	tt	t:
	// recall that th was replaced with þ earlier

.group þ
	þ	T

.group ty
	ty	tj

.group u
	u	u
	ui (+	uI
	// light penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenultimate
	u (L01X	=u
	u (CL01X	=u

.group ú
	ú	u:

.group û
	û	u::

.group v
	v	v

.group w
	w	w

// recall that x was replaced with cs earlier

.group y
	y	j

// z does not occur in Quenya
